Hawaii statutes.
[§321-4.3]
Epidemiologists. The
department of health may establish up to ten permanent or temporary exempt
positions known as epidemiologists for the purpose of investigating diseases
and injuries which threaten the public health and safety. The positions shall
be appointed by the director without regard to chapter 76. [L 2008, c 78, §1]

Previous
Vol06_Ch0321-0344
Next